Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB747.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 6078YC (5) 91 je/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 9.6 Red tape reduction internet 1 site. 2 1. The secretary of state shall establish a red tape 3 reduction internet site. The site shall allow members of the 4 public to request information about state executive branch 5 regulatory restrictions and to communicate with the secretary 6 of state about such restrictions. 7 2. The secretary of state shall annually submit a report 8 to the general assembly prior to the beginning of each regular 9 session detailing the regulatory restrictions subject to 10 requests and communications through the site. 11